North Carolina statutes. Chapter 16. Gaming Contracts and Futures.
Article 1. Gaming Contracts.

§ 16-1.
Gaming and betting contracts void.

All wagers, bets or stakes made to depend upon any race, or upon any gaming by lot or chance, or upon any lot, chance, casualty or unknown or contingent event whatever, shall be unlawful; and all contracts, judgments, conveyances and assurances for and on account of any money or property, or thing in action, so wagered, bet or staked, or to repay, or to secure any money, or property, or thing in action, lent or advanced for the purpose of such wagering, betting, or staking as aforesaid, shall be void.

History.

1810, c. 796, P.R; R.C., c. 51, ss. 1, 2; Code, ss. 2841, 2842; Rev., s. 1687; C.S., s. 2142.

Cross References.

As to criminal laws regarding gambling, see

G.S. 14-289

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Sports Betting has an Equal Sovereignty Problem,” see 67 Duke L.J. Online 1 (2017).

§ 16-2.
Players and betters competent witnesses.

No person shall be excused or incapacitated from confessing or testifying touching any money or property, or thing in action, so wagered, bet or staked, or lent for such purpose, by reason of his having won, played, bet or staked upon any game, lot or chance, casualty, or unknown or contingent event aforesaid; but the confession or testimony of such person shall not be used against him, in any criminal prosecution, on account of such betting, wagering or staking.

History.

R.C., c. 51, s. 3; Code, s. 2843; Rev., s. 1688; C.S., s. 2143.

Cross References.

As to rule of evidence generally that defendant is not compellable to testify, see

G.S. 8-54

.

As to exception with reference to testimony as to gambling, etc., see also

G.S. 8-55

.